Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2905YH (2) 91 ss/jh H.F. 712 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 139A.27 Vaccines ââ limitation of 1 distribution. 2 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 3 vaccine shall not be distributed, sold, or administered in this 4 state unless the manufacturer of the vaccine affirmatively 5 waives any immunity from suit for an injury arising from a 6 design defect of the vaccine, including the immunity granted by 7 the federal National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act, 42 U.S.C. 8 Â§300aa-1 et seq. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 613.22 Vaccine injury ââ waiver of 10 immunity. 11 A manufacturer of a vaccine that is distributed, sold, or 12 administered within this state shall be deemed to have waived 13 any immunity to suit for injuries caused by a design defect of 14 the vaccine, including immunity granted by the federal National 15 Childhood Vaccine Injury Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§300aa-1 et seq. 16